Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1058.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1482. (1) A school district or public school academy shall enroll an eligible pupil in virtual courses in accordance with the provisions of this section. A school district or public school academy shall not offer a virtual course to an eligible pupil unless the virtual course is published in the school district's or public school academy's catalog of board-approved courses or in the statewide catalog of virtual courses maintained by the Michigan Virtual University under section 98 of the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1698. The school district or public school academy shall also provide on its publicly accessible website a link to the statewide catalog of virtual courses maintained by the Michigan Virtual University. Unless the pupil is at least 18 years of age or is an emancipated minor, a pupil must not be enrolled in a course that meets virtually for more than 6 days in a school year without the consent of the pupil's parent or legal guardian. (2) Subject to subsection (3), a school district or public school academy shall enroll an eligible pupil in up to 2 virtual courses as requested by the pupil during an academic term, semester, or trimester. (3) A pupil may be enrolled in more than 2 virtual courses in a specific academic term, semester, or trimester if both of the following conditions are met: (a) The pupil's school district or public school academy has determined that it is in the best interest of the pupil. (b) The pupil agrees with the recommendation of the school district or public school academy. (4) If the number of applicants eligible for acceptance in a virtual course does not exceed the capacity of the provider to provide the virtual course, the provider shall accept for enrollment all of the applicants eligible for acceptance. If the number of applicants exceeds the provider's capacity to provide the virtual course, the provider shall use a random draw system, subject to the need to abide by state and federal antidiscrimination laws and court orders. A school district or public school academy that is also a provider shall determine whether it has the capacity to accept applications for enrollment from nonresident applicants in virtual courses and may use that limit as the reason for refusal to enroll a nonresident applicant. (5) A school district or public school academy may not establish additional requirements beyond those specified in this subsection that would prohibit a pupil from taking a virtual course. A pupil's school district or public school academy may deny the pupil enrollment in a virtual course if any of the following apply, as determined by the school district or public school academy: (a) The pupil is enrolled in any of grades K to 5. (b) The pupil has previously gained the credits that would be provided from the completion of the virtual course. (c) The virtual course is not capable of generating academic credit. (d) The virtual course is inconsistent with the remaining graduation requirements or career interests of the pupil. (e) The pupil has not completed the prerequisite coursework for the requested virtual course or has not demonstrated proficiency in the prerequisite course content. (f) The pupil has failed a previous virtual course in the same subject during the 2 most recent academic years. (g) The virtual course is of insufficient quality or rigor. A school district or public school academy that denies a pupil enrollment request under this subdivision shall enroll the pupil in a virtual course in the same or a similar subject that the school district or public school academy determines is of acceptable quality and rigor. (h) The cost of the virtual course exceeds the amount identified in subsection (10), unless the pupil or the pupil's parent or legal guardian agrees to pay the cost that exceeds this amount. (i) The request for a virtual course enrollment did not occur within the same timelines established by the school district or public school academy for enrollment and schedule changes for regular courses. (j) The request for a virtual course enrollment was not made in the academic term, semester, trimester, or summer preceding the enrollment. This subdivision does not apply to a request made by a pupil who is newly enrolled in the school district or public school academy. (6) If a pupil is denied enrollment in a virtual course by the pupil's school district or public school academy, the school district or public school academy shall provide written notification to the pupil of the denial, the reason or reasons for the denial under subsection (5), and a description of the appeal process. The pupil may appeal the denial by submitting a letter to the superintendent of the intermediate district in which the pupil's school district or public school academy is located. The letter of appeal must include the reason provided by the school district or public school academy for not enrolling the pupil and the reason why the pupil is claiming that the enrollment should be approved. The intermediate school district superintendent or designee shall respond to the appeal not later than 5 days after the appeal is received. If the intermediate district superintendent or designee determines that the denial of enrollment does not meet 1 or more of the reasons specified in subsection (5), the pupil's school district or public school academy shall enroll the pupil in the virtual course. (7) To provide a virtual course to an eligible pupil under this section, a provider must do all of the following: (a) Ensure that the virtual course has been published in the pupil's school district's or public school academy's catalog of board-approved courses or published in the statewide catalog of virtual courses maintained by the Michigan Virtual University. (b) Assign to each pupil a teacher of record and provide the pupil's school district or public school academy with the personnel identification code assigned by the center for the teacher of record. If the provider is a community college, the virtual course must be taught by an instructor employed by or contracted through the providing community college. (c) Offer the virtual course on an open entry and exit method, or aligned to a semester, trimester, or accelerated academic term format. (d) If the virtual course is offered to eligible pupils in more than 1 district, the following additional requirements must also be met: (i) Provide the Michigan Virtual University with a course syllabus that meets the definition under subsection (16)(f) in a form and manner prescribed by the Michigan Virtual University for inclusion in a statewide catalog of virtual courses. (ii) Not later than October 1 of each fiscal year, provide the Michigan Virtual University with an aggregated count of enrollments for each virtual course the provider delivered to pupils under this section during the immediately preceding school year, and the number of enrollments in which the pupil earned 60% or more of the total course points for each virtual course. (8) To provide a virtual course under this section, a community college shall ensure that each virtual course the community college provides under this section generates postsecondary credit. (9) For any virtual course a pupil enrolls in under this section, the pupil's school district or public school academy shall assign the pupil a mentor and shall supply the provider with the mentor's contact information. (10) For a pupil enrolled in 1 or more virtual courses, the pupil's school district or public school academy shall use foundation allowance or per-pupil funds calculated under section 20 of the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1620, to pay for the expenses associated with the virtual course or courses. A school district or public school academy is not required to pay toward the cost of a virtual course an amount that exceeds 6.67% of the target foundation allowance for the current fiscal year as calculated under section 20 of the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1620. (11) A virtual learning pupil has the same rights and access to technology in the pupil's school district's or public school academy's facilities as all other pupils enrolled in the pupil's school district or public school academy. The department shall establish standards for hardware, software, and internet access for pupils who are enrolled in more than 2 virtual courses under this section in an academic term, semester, or trimester taken at a location other than a school facility. (12) If a pupil successfully completes a virtual course, as determined by the pupil's school district or public school academy, the pupil's school district or public school academy shall grant appropriate academic credit for completion of the course and shall count that credit toward completion of graduation and subject area requirements. A pupil's school record and transcript must identify the virtual course title as it appears in the virtual course syllabus. (13) The enrollment of a pupil in 1 or more virtual courses must not result in a pupil being counted as more than 1.0 full-time equivalent pupil under article I of the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1601 to 388.1772. The minimum requirements to count the pupil in membership are those established by the pupil accounting manual as it was in effect for the 2015-2016 school year or as subsequently amended by the department if the department notifies the legislature about the proposed amendment at least 60 days before the amendment becomes effective. (14) Subject to the requirements of this subsection, a school district or public school academy may provide virtual instruction under this subsection for not more than 6 days in a school year. If a school district or public school academy plans to provide instruction under this subsection to pupils, the school district's or public school academy's plan must be approved by the board of the school district, and the school district or public school academy must provide notice of the plan to impacted pupils and their parents or legal guardians before enactment of the plan. Instruction may be provided synchronously or asynchronously, as determined by the department. Days of instruction under this subsection may be used only for the following purposes, as defined by the department: (a) A maximum of 3 days may be designated as testing days, during which pupils are released from regular classroom instruction to participate in state or federally mandated assessments. Days of virtual instruction provided under this subdivision are limited to buildings and grade levels impacted by assessments. (b) A maximum of 3 days of virtual instruction may be provided due to conditions not within control of the district, including, but not limited to, closures due to snow, ice, or other extreme weather events or unforeseen emergencies. Days of virtual instruction under this subdivision may be used only after a district has exhausted all emergency closure days permitted under section 101 of the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1701. (15) The department shall promulgate rules for the conditions under which virtual instruction may be provided under subsection (14) and the manner in which it may be provided. (16) As used in this section: (a) "Instructor" means an individual who is employed by or contracted through a community college. (b) "Mentor" means a professional employee of the school district or public school academy who monitors the pupil's progress, ensures the pupil has access to needed technology, is available for assistance, and ensures access to the teacher of record. A mentor may also serve as the teacher of record if the school district or public school academy is the provider for the virtual course and the mentor meets the requirements under subdivision (d). (c) "Provider" means the school district, intermediate school district, public school academy, community college, or other third-party vendor that the school district or public school academy pays to provide the virtual course, or the Michigan Virtual University if it is providing the virtual course. (d) "Teacher of record" means a teacher who meets all of the following: (i) Is appropriately placed under a valid Michigan teaching certificate or a teaching permit, authorization, or approval issued by the department. As used in this subparagraph, "appropriately placed" means holding a valid Michigan educator credential with the required grade range and discipline or subject area for the assignment, as defined by the superintendent of public instruction. (ii) Is responsible for providing instruction, determining instructional methods for each pupil, diagnosing learning needs, assessing pupil learning, prescribing intervention strategies and modifying lessons, reporting outcomes, and evaluating the effects of instruction and support strategies. (iii) Has a personnel identification code provided by the center. (iv) If the provider is a community college, is an instructor employed by or contracted through the providing community college. (e) "Virtual course" means a course of study that is capable of generating a credit or a grade and that is provided in an interactive learning environment where any portion of the curriculum is delivered using the internet and in which pupils may be separated from their instructor or teacher of record by time or location, or both. (f) "Virtual course syllabus" means a document that includes all of the following: (i) An alignment document detailing how the course meets applicable state standards or, if this state does not have state standards, nationally recognized standards. (ii) The virtual course content outline. (iii) The virtual course required assessments. (iv) The virtual course prerequisites. (v) Expectations for actual instructor or teacher of record contact time with the virtual learning pupil and other communications between a pupil and the instructor or teacher of record. (vi) Academic support available to the virtual learning pupil. (vii) The virtual course learning outcomes and objectives. (viii) The name of the institution or organization providing the virtual content. (ix) The name of the institution or organization providing the instructor or teacher of record. (x) The course titles assigned by the provider and the course titles and course codes from the National Center for Education Statistics (NCES) School Courses for the Exchange of Data (SCED). (xi) The number of eligible pupils that will be accepted by the provider in the virtual course. A school district or public school academy that is also the provider may limit the enrollment to those pupils enrolled in the school district or public school academy. (xii) The results of the virtual course quality review using the guidelines and model review process published by the Michigan Virtual University. (g) "Virtual learning pupil" means a pupil enrolled in 1 or more virtual courses.